Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 3 Vote Recorders and Tabulating Machines

21-2-350 through 21-2-364.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 2-10 provided for the repeal of this part effective April 1, 2003. This part consisted of Code Sections

21-2-350

through 21-2-364, relating to voting machines and vote recorders, and was based on Code 1933, §§ 34-1217—34-1230, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 226, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 851, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1968, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, §§ 9, 9a, 16a; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, §§ 17, 18; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 22; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1292, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 675, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1087, §§ 3-7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 30; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 12, 36; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 11; Code 1981, § 21-2-354.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 26; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, §§ 25, 27; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 2-10, effective April 1, 2003.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 2-10 repealed and reserved this article, effective April 1, 2003.